Nebraska statutes.
Reissue Revised Statutes of Nebraska77-2712.07
Rights under the agreement.

(1) The agreement binds and inures only to the benefit of Nebraska and the other member states. No person, other than a member state, is an intended beneficiary of the agreement. Any benefit to a person is established by the laws of Nebraska and the other member states and not by the terms of the agreement.

(2) No person shall have any cause of action or defense under the agreement or by virtue of this state's approval of the agreement. No person may challenge, in any action brought under any provision of law, any action or inaction by any department, agency, or other instrumentality of Nebraska, or any political subdivision of Nebraska, on the ground that the action or inaction is inconsistent with the agreement.

(3) No law of Nebraska, or the application thereof, may be declared invalid as to any person or circumstance on the ground that the provision or application is inconsistent with the agreement.

Laws 2001, LB 172, § 8.